Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.970

Electric vehicle infrastructure.

The department of commerce must distribute to local governments model ordinances, model development regulations, and guidance for local governments for siting and installing electric vehicle infrastructure, and in particular battery charging stations, and appropriate handling, recycling, and storage of electric vehicle batteries and equipment, when available. The model ordinances, model development regulations, and guidance must be developed by a federal or state agency, or nationally recognized organizations with specific expertise in land-use regulations or electric vehicle infrastructure.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2046; 2009 c 459 s 18.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Finding—Purpose—2009 c 459: See note following RCW 47.80.090.

Regional transportation planning organizations—Electric vehicle infrastructure: RCW 47.80.090.